RBMT/ling073-div/.deps/div.LR.lexc
!Morphological Transducer for Divehi

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<np%> ! Proper Nouns
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<dem%> ! Demonstrative
%<det%> ! Determiner
%<num%> ! Numeral
%<cnjcoo%> ! Conjunctions
%<post%> ! Postposition
%<mod%> ! Modal word for emphasis

! Noun - Human/NonHuman
%<hum%> ! Human
%<nhum%>! Non-human

! Noun - Number
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sp%>  ! Singular or Plural

! Noun - Definiteness
%<def%>  ! Definite
%<ind%>  ! Indefinite
%<uns%>  ! Unspecified
%<ndef%> ! Not Definite (indefinite/unspecified)

! Noun - Cases
%<dir%> ! Direct
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<loc%> ! Locative
%<ablins%> ! Ablative/Instrumental
%<dat%> ! Dative
%<soc%> ! Sociative

! Person
%<pers%> ! Personal tag
%<p1%> ! First Person
%<p2%> ! Second Person
%<p3%> ! Third Person

! Verb - Transitivity
%<tv%> ! Transitive
%<iv%> ! Intransitive

! Verb-Voices
%<act%> ! Active
%<pass%> ! Passive
%<caus%> ! Causative

! Verb - Tenses
%<pprs%> ! Present Progressive Tense
%<pres%> ! Simple Present Tense
%<fut%> ! Future Tense
%<past%> ! Past Tense
%<perf%> ! Perfect Tense

! Verb - Moods
%<opt%> ! Optative Mood
%<imp%> ! Imperative Mood
%<pot%> ! Potential Mood

! Demonstrative - Degrees
%<deg1%> ! Degree 1
%<deg2%> ! Degree 2
%<deg3%> ! Degree 3

! Question words
%<itg%> ! Interrogative

! Numeral type
%<ord%> ! Ordinal

! Proper Noun type
%<ant%> ! first name
%<cog%> ! last name
%<top%> ! location
%<org%> ! organization
%<al%> ! others, msc

! Other symbols
% 
%+
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%<fm%> ! Formal
%<infm%> ! Informal
%<std%> ! Standard
%<dst%> ! Distal
%<prx%> ! Proximal
%<neg%> ! Negation
%<cont%> ! Continuous Marker
%<succ%> ! Successive particle
%<pos%> ! Possessive
%<qnt%> ! Quantifiers
%<ij%> ! Interjection

! Puntuation symbols
%<sent%> ! Sentence marker
%<guio%> ! Hyphen
%<cm%> ! Comma
%<apos%> ! Apostrophe
%<quot%> ! Quote marker
%<rpar%> ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%> ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

! Morphophonological symbols
%{H%}    ! For human plural nouns, either /i/, /u/, or //
%{C%}    ! For genitive/locative case, either /i/, /e/, /u/ or //
%{I%}    ! For ablative/instrumental case, /i/, or //
%{S%}    ! For verb inflections, /aa/ or /ee/
%{X%}    ! For human noun pluralization exceptions

!!!!!!!! MORPHOTACTICS !!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
Noun-DemDet-Prefix ;
Noun-Number-Prefix ;
Noun-Roots ;
Verb-Prefix ;
PropNouns ;
AdjRoot ;
AdverbRoot ;
PPRoot ; ! personal pronouns root
DemonRoot ;
ConjRoot ;
QuestionRoot ;
Determiners ;
Punctuation ;
ModalWords ;   ! Sentence-level modal words
Proper-Nouns ;
Postpositions ; 
Numbers ;
NumbersRoot ;
Digits ; ! Use/Circ

!Define unknown alphabet
ޙޚޢޣޥޛޘޡޤޝޞޟޜޠﷲ:ޙޚޢޣޥޛޘޡޤޝޞޟޜޠﷲ # ; ! Arabic letters
ހށނރބޅކވމފދތލގޏސޑޒޓޔޕޖޗ:ހށނރބޅކވމފދތލގޏސޑޒޓޔޕޖޗ #; ! Consonants

!Nouns
LEXICON Noun-DemDet-Prefix
މި%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg1%>%+:މި Noun-Number-Prefix ;
ތި%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg2%>%+:ތި Noun-Number-Prefix ;
އެ%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg3%>%+:އެ Noun-Number-Prefix ;
މި%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg1%>%+:މި Noun-Roots ; ! "this/these"
ތި%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg2%>%+:ތި Noun-Roots ; ! "that/those"
އެ%<det%>%<dem%>%<deg3%>%+:އެ Noun-Roots ; ! "that/those"
Noun-Number-Prefix ;
Noun-Roots ;

LEXICON Noun-Number-Prefix
އެއް%<num%>%+:އެއް Noun-Roots ; ! "one"
ދެ%<num%>%+:ދެ Noun-Roots ; ! "two"
ތިން%<num%>%+:ތިން Noun-Roots ; ! "three"
ހަތަރު%<num%>%+:ހަތަރު Noun-Roots ; ! "four"
ފަސް%<num%>%+:ފަސް Noun-Roots ; ! "five"
ހަ%<num%>%+:ހަ Noun-Roots ; ! "six"
ހަތް%<num%>%+:ހަތް Noun-Roots ; ! "seven"
އަށް%<num%>%+:އަށް Noun-Roots ; ! "eight"
ނުވަ%<num%>%+:ނުވަ Noun-Roots ; ! "nine"
ދިހަ%<num%>%+:ދިހަ Noun-Roots ; ! "ten"

LEXICON Noun-Roots
HumanNounRoot ;
NonHumanRoot ;
BoatRoot ;
KinshipRoot ;

LEXICON Noun-Human
%<n%>%<hum%>%<sg%>: HSG-Def-Cases ;
%<n%>%<hum%>%<sg%>: HSG-nDef-Cases ;
%<n%>%<hum%>%<pl%>:%>%{H%}ން HPL-Def-Cases ;
!There is no plural H-nDef-Cases

LEXICON Noun-Kinship
%<n%>%<hum%>%<sg%>: HSG-Def-Cases ;
%<n%>%<hum%>%<sg%>: HSG-nDef-Cases ;
%<n%>%<hum%>%<pl%>:%>މެން HPL-Def-Cases ;

LEXICON Noun-NonHuman
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<sg%>: NH-Def-Cases ;
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<sg%>: NH-nDef-Cases ;
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<pl%>:%>ތައް NH-Def-Cases ;
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<pl%>:%>ތައް NH-nDef-Cases ;

LEXICON Noun-Boat
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<sg%>: NH-Def-Cases ;
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<sg%>: NH-nDef-Cases ;
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<pl%>:%>ފަހަރު NH-Def-Cases ; ! -faharu
%<n%>%<nhum%>%<pl%>:%>ފަހަރު NH-nDef-Cases ; ! -faharu

! Definiteness-Case Combinations
LEXICON NH-Def-Cases
%<def%>%<dir%>: NounClitics ;  !Definite Direct
%<def%>%<gen%>:%>%{C%}ގެ  NounClitics ;  !Definite Genetive
%<def%>%<loc%>:%>%{C%}ގައި NounClitics ; !Definite Locative
%<def%>%<dat%>:%>އަށް  NounClitics ;  !Definite Dative
%<def%>%<ablins%>:%>%{I%}ން  NounClitics ;  !Definite Ablative/Instrumental
%<def%>%<soc%>:%>އާ  NounClitics ;   !Definite Sociative

LEXICON NH-nDef-Cases
%<ind%>%<dir%>:%>އެއް NounClitics ;  !Indefinite Direct
%<uns%>%<dir%>:%>އަކު NounClitics ;  !Unspecified Direct
%<ndef%>%<gen%>:%>އެއްް%>%{C%}ގެ  NounClitics ;  !Indefinite Genetive
%<ndef%>%<loc%>:%>އެއްް%>%{C%}ގައި NounClitics ; !Indefinite Locative
%<ndef%>%<dat%>:%>އަކު%>އަށް  NounClitics ;  !Unspecified Dative
%<ndef%>%<ablins%>:%>އަކު%>%{I%}ން  NounClitics ;  !Unspecified Ablative/Instrumental
%<ndef%>%<soc%>:%>އަކު%>އާ  NounClitics ;   !Unspecified Sociative

LEXICON HSG-Def-Cases
%<def%>%<dir%>: NounClitics ; !Definite Direct
%<def%>%<gen%>:%>%{C%}ގެ NounClitics ; !Definite Genetive
%<def%>%<dat%>:%>އަށް NounClitics ; !Definite Dative
%<def%>%<soc%>:%>އާ NounClitics ; !Definite Sociative

LEXICON HSG-nDef-Cases
%<ind%>%<dir%>:%>އެއްް NounClitics ; !Indefinite Direct
%<uns%>%<dir%>:%>އަކު NounClitics ; !Unspecified Direct
%<ndef%>%<gen%>:%>އެއްް%>ގެ NounClitics ; !Indefinite Genetive
%<ndef%>%<dat%>:%>އަކު%>އަށް NounClitics ; !Unspecified Dative
%<ndef%>%<soc%>:%>އަކު%>އާ NounClitics ; !Unspecified Sociative

LEXICON HPL-Def-Cases
%<def%>%<dir%>: NounClitics ; !Definite Direct
%<def%>%<gen%>:%>ގެ NounClitics ; !Definite Genetive
%<def%>%<dat%>:%>އަށް NounClitics ; !Definite Dative
%<def%>%<soc%>:%>އާ NounClitics ; !Definite Sociative

LEXICON NounClitics
%+އޯ%<mod%>:އޯ # ;
%+އޭ%<mod%>:އޭ # ;
%+ވެސް%<mod%>:ވެސް # ;
%+ވުރެ%<post%>:ވުރެ # ;
%+އެވެ%<mod%>:އެވެ # ;
# ;

LEXICON PropNouns
%<np%>: PropNounTypes ; 

LEXICON PropNounTypes
%<ant%>: PropNounNumber ; ! "first name"
%<cog%>: PropNounNumber ; ! "last name"
%<top%>: PropNounNumber ; ! "location"
%<org%>: PropNounNumber ; ! "organization"
%<al%>: PropNounNumber ; ! "others, msc"

LEXICON PropNounNumber 
%<sg%>: # ; 
%<pl%>: # ; 
%<sp%>: # ;

!Adjectivies
LEXICON AdjEnding
%<adj%>: # ;

!Adverbs
LEXICON AdverbEnding
%<adv%>: # ;

!Question Words
LEXICON Interrogative
%<itg%>: # ;

!Conjunction
LEXICON ConjEnding
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

!Verbs
LEXICON Verb-Prefix 
ނު%<neg%>%+:ނު VerbRoot ; ! "not"
އެބަ%<cont%>%+:އެބަ VerbRoot ; ! "continous marker"
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON Verb-TV-ActiveStem  ! Transitive verbs
%<v%>%<tv%>%<act%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;

LEXICON Verb-TV-CausativeStem  ! Transitive
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;

LEXICON Verb-TV-PassiveStem   ! Transitive
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;

LEXICON Verb-IV-ActiveStem  ! Intransitive verbs
%<v%>%<iv%>%<act%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;

LEXICON Verb-IV-CausativeStem  ! Intransitive
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;

LEXICON Verb-IV-PassiveStem   ! Intransitive
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>: Verb-Tense-Person ;  ! Impersonal

LEXICON Verb-Tense-Person
%<pres%>%<p1%>:%>ން VerbClitics ;
%<pres%>%<p3%>:%>%{S%} VerbClitics ;
%<fut%>%<p1%>:%>%{S%}ނަން VerbClitics ;
%<fut%>%<p3%>:%>%{S%}ނެ VerbClitics ;
%<pprs%>:%>ނީ VerbClitics ;

LEXICON VerbClitics
%+އެވެ%<mod%>:އެވެ # ;
# ;

!PP = Personal Pronouns
 
LEXICON PPFirstSGInf
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<infm%>: PronounCase ;
LEXICON PPFirstSGStd
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<std%>: PronounCase ;
LEXICON PPFirstSGFm
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<fm%>: PronounCase ;

LEXICON NonHumanRoot
ކަކުނި:ކަކުނި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "crab"
ރާއްޖެ:ރާއްޖެ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "country"
ފޮތް:ފޮތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "book"
މާއްދާ:މާއްދާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "article"
ކަފަ:ކަފަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "cotton"
އާފަލު:އާފަލު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "apple"
ފޮތް:ފޮތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "book"
ދޫނި:ދޫނި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "bird"
ތަރި:ތަރި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "star"
މަގު:މަގު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "street"
ދޮންކެޔޮ:ދޮންކެޔޮ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "banana"
ކަރާ:ކަރާ Noun-NonHuman ; !  "watermelon"
ބަސް:ބަސް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "language"
ބަދަލު:ބަދަލު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "change"
ބޮއް:ބޮއް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "frog"
ނަން:ނަން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "name"
ބުޅާ:ބުޅާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "cat"
މެހި:މެހި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "fly"
ކާށި:ކާށި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "coconut"
މައްސަލަ:މައްސަލަ Noun-NonHuman; ! "problem"
އަތް:އަތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "arm"
ރަށް:ރަށް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "island"
ޤައުމު:ޤައުމު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "nation"
ފާހަނަ:ފާހަނަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "bathroom"
އިންގިރޭސި:އިންގިރޭސި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "English"
ދިވެހިބަސް:ދިވެހިބަސް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Maldivian"
މުބާރާތް:މުބާރާތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "competition"
ތަރައްގީ:ތަރައްގީ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "improvement"
އާއިލާ:އާއިލާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "family"
އާމްދަނީ:އާމްދަނީ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "income"
އިތުރުވުން:އިތުރުވުން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "surplus"
އިސްލާޙް:އިސްލާޙް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "reform"
ޑިމޮކްރެސީ:ޑިމޮކްރެސީ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "democracy"
މަދްރަސާ:މަދްރަސާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "school"
ގެ:ގެ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "house"
ދަނޑި:ދަނޑި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "pole"
ބޮކި:ބޮކި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "bubble/lightbulb"
ސަރަހައްދު:ސަރަހައްދު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "region"
ސައިބޯނި:ސައިބޯނި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "soap"
ގަޑި:ގަޑި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "hour/clock"
އިރު:އިރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "time"
ރީތިކަން:ރީތިކަން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "beauty"
ގޮތް:ގޮތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "way"
އަތުކުރީ:އަތުކުރީ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "wrist"
ވާހަކަ:ވާހަކަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "story"
ޙައްޤު:ޙައްޤު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "right"
މަސައްކަތް:މަސައްކަތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "work"
ކަން:ކަން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "action"
ދީން:ދީން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "religion"
ޖަލްސާ:ޖަލްސާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "assembly"
ދަތުރު:ދަތުރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "journey"
ބޯ:ބޯ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "head"
ލޯ:ލޯ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "eye"
ނޭފަތް:ނޭފަތް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "nose"
މައްސަލަ:މައްސަލަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "case"
ސަރުކާރު:ސަރުކާރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "government"
ތަން:ތަން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "place"
ގެރިބަކަރި:ގެރިބަކަރި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "livestock"
ކަނޑިބަޑި:ކަނޑިބަޑި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "weapon"
ފޭޑި:ފޭޑި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "skill"
ސޫފި:ސޫފި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "insect"
ދޫނި:ދޫނި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "bird"
މަސް:މަސް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "fish" 
މާ:މާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "flower"
ގަސް:ގަސް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "tree"
މިން:މިން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "amount"
ބަރުމިން:ބަރުމިން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "weight"
އުސްމިން:އުސްމިން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "height"
ހޫނުމިން:ހޫނުމިން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "temperature"
ފެން:ފެން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "water"
ހަރު:ހަރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "shelf"
ފެންގަނޑު:ފެންގަނޑު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "lake"
ކުއްތާ:ކުއްތާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "dog"
އަސަރު:އަސަރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "effect"
ރިޕޯޓް:ރިޕޯޓް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "report"
ވެލާ:ވެލާ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "sea turtle"
ކުކުޅު:ކުކުޅު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "chicken"
ސުވާލު:ސުވާލު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "question"
ހޯމަ:ހޯމަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Monday"
އަންގާރަ:އަންގާރަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Tuesday"
ބުދަ:ބުދަ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Wednesday"
ބުރާސްފަތި:ބުރާސްފަތި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Thursday"
ހުކުރު:ހުކުރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Friday"
ހޮނިހިރު:ހޮނިހިރު Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Saturday"
އާދީއްތި:އާދީއްތި Noun-NonHuman ; ! "Sunday"
ދުވަސް:ދުވަސް Noun-NonHuman ; ! "day"
ދުނިޔެ:ދުނިޔެ Noun-NonHuman ; ! "earth"
އަލިކަން:އަލިކަން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "light"
ބިމުން:ބިމުން Noun-NonHuman ; ! "land"
